Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1
COLORADO COMMISSION ON
HIGHER EDUCATION

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 22 of chapter 124 in C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1985, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For provisions and requirements of a work-study program, see part 4 of article 3.3 of this title; for provisions of the Colorado educational exchange program, see part 6 of article 3.3 of this title.

Section

23-1-101. Legislative declaration.

The purposes of this article are to maximize opportunities for postsecondary education in Colorado; to avoid and to eliminate needless duplication of facilities and programs in state-supported institutions of higher education; to achieve simplicity of state administrative procedures pertaining to higher education; to effect the best utilization of available resources so as to achieve an adequate level of higher education in the most economic manner; to accommodate state priorities and the needs of individual students through implementation of a statewide enrollment plan; and to continue to recognize the constitutional and statutory responsibilities of duly constituted governing boards of state-supported institutions of higher education in Colorado. In this article, express powers and duties are delegated to a central policy and coordinating board, the Colorado commission on higher education, and the department of higher education is responsible for implementing the duly adopted policies of the Colorado commission on higher education. The ultimate authority and responsibility is expressly reserved to the general assembly, and it is the duty of the Colorado commission on higher education and the department of higher education to implement the policies of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 750, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1792, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1470, § 1, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-1-101 as it existed prior to 1985.

23-1-101.1. Definitions.

As used in this article 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education created and existing pursuant to this article.

"Department of higher education" or "department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114, C.R.S.

"Executive director" means the office of the executive director of the Colorado commission on higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114, C.R.S.

"Legacy preference" means a preference given by a higher education institution to certain applicants on the basis of their familial relationship to alumni of that institution.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1470, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2021:

IP amended and (4) added, (HB 21-1173), ch. 185, p. 994, § 2, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1173, see section 1 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-1-102. Commission established - terms of office.

Repealed.

There is established a central policy and coordinating board for higher education in the state of Colorado, to be known as the Colorado commission on higher education, referred to in this article 1 as the "commission". The duties and powers delegated to the commission by this article 1 apply to all state-supported institutions of higher education, including, but not limited to, all postsecondary institutions in the state supported in whole or part by state funds, and including community colleges, extension programs of the state-supported universities and colleges, local district colleges, area technical colleges, the Auraria higher education center established in article 70 of this title 23, and specifically the regents of the university of Colorado and the institutions it governs. The governing boards and institutions of the public system of higher education in Colorado, including the university of Colorado, are obligated to conform to the policies set by the commission within the authorities delegated to it in this article 1. The commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The commission consists of the following members, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate:

One member from each congressional district in the state; and

Three members from the state at large.

The governor shall select the members of the commission on the basis of their knowledge of and interest in higher education. At least one member of the commission must reside west of the continental divide. No more than a minimum majority of the members of the commission may be affiliated with the same political party at any time.

The term of each member is four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than a minimum majority of members' terms expire in the same year. No member of the commission may serve more than two consecutive full four-year terms.

At the time of appointment, no member of the commission shall have been an officer, employee, or member of a governing board or an officer or employee of any state-supported institution of higher education in the state for a period of one year prior to his or her appointment. During his or her term of office, no member of the commission shall be a member of the general assembly or an officer, employee, or member of a governing board or an officer or employee of a state-supported institution of higher education.

Members of the commission are entitled to receive seventy-five dollars per diem for attendance at official meetings plus actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of official business.

The commission shall meet as often as necessary to carry out its duties as defined in this article.

The term of any member of the commission who misses more than two consecutive regular commission meetings without good cause shall be terminated and his successor appointed in the manner provided for appointments under this section.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 412, § 2, effective April 13, 2000.)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 750, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3) amended, p. 840, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 96:

(6) amended, p. 1834, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 99:

(8) added, p. 880, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(8) amended, p. 412, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 2001:

(3)(a), (4), and (5) amended, p. 145, § 1, effective March 23.

L. 2004:

(3)(b) repealed, p. 201, § 15, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1) repealed, p. 277, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (SB 12-040), ch. 118, p. 401, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 142, § 8, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(3) and (5) amended and (8)(a) repealed, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 29, § 37, effective February 25; (2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3354, § 11, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-1-102 as it existed prior to 1985.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-1-103. Advisory committee to the Colorado commission on higher education.

There is hereby established an advisory committee to the commission for the purpose of suggesting solutions for the problems and needs of higher education and maintaining liaison with the general assembly and the governing boards for state-supported institutions of higher education. The advisory committee shall consist of not less than thirteen members, to be designated as follows:

Six members shall be appointed from the general assembly, including three senators, two of whom shall be from the majority party, appointed by the president of the senate, and one of whom shall be from the minority party, appointed by the senate minority leader, and three representatives, two of whom shall be from the majority party, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one of whom shall be from the minority party, appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the six members shall be appointed for terms of two years.

The terms of the members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate and who are serving on March 22, 2007, shall be extended to and expire on or shall terminate on the convening date of the first regular session of the sixty-seventh general assembly. As soon as practicable after such convening date, the speaker and the president shall each appoint or reappoint successors in the same manner as provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a). Thereafter, the terms of members appointed or reappointed by the speaker and the president shall expire on the convening date of the first regular session of each general assembly, and all subsequent appointments and reappointments by the speaker and the president shall be made as soon as practicable after such convening date. The person making the original appointment or reappointment shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term. Members appointed or reappointed by the speaker and the president shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and shall continue in office until the member's successor is appointed.

One member shall be selected and designated by the commission to represent the faculty in the state and one member shall be selected and designated by the commission to represent the students in the state. On and after August 5, 2009, the commission shall select and designate one member who, at the time of designation, is a parent of a student who is enrolled in a state-supported institution of higher education in Colorado to represent the parents of students.

Not more than four additional members representing educational or other groups may be selected and designated by the commission to serve on the advisory committee.

Legislative members of the advisory committee shall receive compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in section 2-2-326, C.R.S. Members of the advisory committee not otherwise compensated by the state or a public educational institution shall receive thirty dollars per diem for attendance at official meetings plus reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of official business.

All members of the advisory committee shall receive agendas and background material and be notified of all public meetings of the commission and shall be invited to attend for the purpose of suggesting solutions for the problems and needs of higher education and maintaining liaison with the general assembly.

In addition to any attendance at commission meetings, the committee shall meet as often as necessary to provide assistance to the commission.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 751, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(5) amended, p. 412, § 20, effective March 26.

L. 89:

(5) repealed, p. 1147, § 3, effective April 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) amended, p. 180, § 12, effective March 22.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1471, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 09-090), ch. 291, p. 1441, § 9, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1962, § 12, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-1-103 as it existed prior to 1985.

23-1-103.5. Establishment of annual allowable cash fund revenues and expenditures by general assembly. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1510, § 13, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 2121, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 480, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 117, § 1, effective March 19.

23-1-104. Financing the system of postsecondary education - report.

Repealed.

For the 2010-11 fiscal year and for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2016, the general assembly shall make annual appropriations of general fund money, of cash funds received from tuition income, and of money that is estimated to be received by an institution, under the direction and control of the governing board, as stipends, as defined in section 23-18-102, and through fee-for-service contracts, as authorized in section 23-1-109.7 or 23-18-303.5, whichever is applicable, as a single line item to each governing board for the operation of its campuses; except that, if the general assembly appropriates money, as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section, to the Colorado state forest service, the agricultural experiment station department of the Colorado state university, or the Colorado state university cooperative extension service, such money shall not be included within the single line item appropriations described in this subsection (1)(b).

For the 2010-11 fiscal year and for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2016, the general assembly shall also make annual appropriations of cash funds, other than cash funds received as tuition income or as fees, as a single line item to each governing board for the operation of its campuses. Each governing board shall allocate said cash fund appropriations to the institutions under its control in the manner deemed most appropriate by the governing board; except that, if the general assembly appropriates money pursuant to section 23-31.5-112 or 27-80-118, that money is not included within the single line item appropriation described in this subsection (1)(b)(II).

In addition to any appropriations made pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, the general assembly may make annual appropriations of general fund money and of money received pursuant to a fee-for-service contract negotiated by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system or the regents of the university of Colorado, whichever is applicable, and the department of higher education, as described in section 23-18-303.5, as separate line items to:

The Colorado state forest service described in part 3 of article 31 of this title 23;

The agricultural experiment station department of the Colorado state university described in part 6 of article 31 of this title 23;

The Colorado state university cooperative extension service described in part 7 of article 31 of this title 23; and

The center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies created in section 27-80-118.

In accordance with the provisions of section 5 of article VIII of the state constitution, the governing boards of the state institutions of higher education shall have control and direction of any moneys received by their respective institutions in addition to the moneys appropriated pursuant to this subsection (1), unless otherwise provided by statute.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, beginning in the 2011-12 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter through the 2020-21 fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate moneys to the governing board of the Colorado school of mines in accordance with section 23-41-104.7, through fee-for-service contracts, as authorized in sections 23-1-109.7 and 23-18-303, and as stipends, as defined in section 23-18-102, as a single line item to said governing board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-75-102, the governing boards are authorized to retain all money appropriated pursuant to this section or otherwise generated from fiscal year to fiscal year.

All moneys raised by a governing board shall be available for expenditure by such governing board and shall not be transferred or otherwise made available for expenditure by any other governing board or by a state entity or state agency; except that said moneys may be transferred to the department of higher education or the Colorado commission on higher education to the extent required to pay indirect cost assessments, as defined in section 24-75-112 (1)(f), C.R.S.

(3.5) Each governing board shall report to the Colorado commission on higher education, using approved forms, the institution's plans for any tuition or other proposed increases for the following fiscal year. The commission shall review the plans and make recommendations to the general assembly during the annual budget process.

On or before November 10, 2010, each governing board shall submit to the commission and to the joint budget committee of the general assembly a report describing, with regard to each institution under its governance, the governing board's plans to fund the institution in the following fiscal year if the general assembly reduces overall state funding for higher education by fifty percent.

Each governing board's report prepared pursuant to this subsection (4) shall specifically address the manner in which the institutions governed by the governing board shall serve students who graduate from Colorado high schools and are enrolling as first-time freshmen students and meet one or more of the following criteria:

The student's family is low-income and the student is likely to incur significant student debt in attending an institution of higher education;

The student's parents did not attend postsecondary education and may not have graduated from high school;

The student is a member of an underrepresented population; or

The student has limited access to technologies to support learning.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 752, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 839, § 1, effective June 16.

L. 89:

(1)(c) amended, p. 975, § 1, effective May 26; (2) amended, p. 1643, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 90:

(3) amended, p. 1138, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1511, § 14, effective June 6; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 2122, § 2, effective June 11.

L. 96:

(1)(a)(III) added, p. 790, § 2, effective May 23; (1)(a)(I) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1830, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(1.5) amended, p. 1644, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(4), (5), and (6) added, p. 1279, § 4, effective July 1; (7) and (8) added, p. 1259, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4)(c.5) and (7)(b.5) added, p. 397, § § 1, 2, effective March 5; IP(5) and (6)(c) amended and (5.5) and (9) added, p. 775, § 3, effective March 25; (7)(a), (7)(b), and (8)(b) amended, p. 1993, § 36, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(8)(b) amended, p. 1200, § 59, effective August 4; (1)(a)(I) and (1)(d) amended, p. 718, § 7, effective July 1, 2005; (1.5)(b) and (2)(c) added by revision, pp. 723, 724, §§ 15, 18.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 118, § 2, effective March 19; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 274, § 1, effective March 31; (1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(IV) added, p. 980, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2010:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1839, § 4, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1418, § 4, effective August 10; (2) amended, (HB 11-1074), ch. 61, p. 160, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(b)(I), IP(1)(c), and (2) amended, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 612, § 9, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 16-191), ch. 214, p. 825, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) amended and (3.5) added, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 819, § 9, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 19-1311), ch. 344, p. 3193, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1)(b)(I) and IP(1)(c) amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 833, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

L. 2021:

(1)(b)(II) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2362, § 3, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(I) and IP(1)(c) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2973, § 44, effective August 10.

23-1-105. Duties and powers of the commission with respect to appropriations.

The commission shall prescribe uniform financial reporting policies, including policies for counting and classifying full-time equivalent students, for the institutions and governing boards within the state-supported system of higher education.

to (3.7) Repealed.

(4) The commission may seek, receive, and disburse federal, state, and private grants, gifts, and trusts for statewide or multiinstitutional purposes.

(5) The commission, after consultation with the governing boards of institutions, shall establish policies for the public system of higher education for determining student residency status for tuition classification purposes within statutory guidelines established in article 7 of this title.

(6)

(7) Repealed.

(8) The funding recommendations made by the commission for state-supported institutions of higher education and by the executive director for the divisions of the department of higher education shall be made to the governor and the general assembly as a part of the budget request for the department of higher education and shall be submitted in accordance with the budget procedures of part 3 of article 37 of title 24, C.R.S., and in conformance with section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.

(9) to (11) Repealed.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 753, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(7) amended, p. 842, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 90:

(6) amended and (8) added, p. 1143, § 1, effective June 7; (7) repealed, p. 1142, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(6) amended, p. 560, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 93:

IP(3) amended, p. 1519, § 24, effective June 6; (3.5) added, p. 2122, § 3, effective June 11.

L. 94:

(9) added, p. 42, § 1, effective March 11; (3.5)(a) amended, p. 1681, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(3.5)(a) and (3.5)(b) amended and (10) added, pp. 56, 48, §§ 5, 1, effective March 20.

L. 96:

(11) added, p. 88, § 1, effective March 20; (2) and (3.5)(a) amended, (3)(d) and (3.7) added, and (6) repealed, pp. 1831, 1835, §§ 4, 3, 11, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(3.5) and (9) to (11) repealed and (3.7)(a) amended, p. 1644, §§ 1, 3, effective June 5.

L. 2003:

(8) amended, p. 1994, § 37, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(2)(b) and (3.1) added by revision, pp. 723, 724, §§ 15, 18.

L. 2008:

(8) amended, p. 1471, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 2011:

(3.7) repealed, (SB 11-052), ch. 232, p. 999, § 5, effective May 27.

23-1-105.5. Duties and powers of the commission with respect to student fees - report on tuition and fees.

The commission shall adopt policies concerning the collection and use of student fees by the governing boards of the state institutions of higher education, as defined in section 23-5-119.5. The policies may address, but need not be limited to, the purposes for student fees categories of student fees, the distinctions between tuition revenue and student fee revenue, accounting for student fee revenue, student fee fund balances, the minimum level of student involvement in the processes for establishing, reviewing, changing the amount of, and discontinuing student fees, and student fees that apply to a student concurrently enrolled pursuant to article 35 of title 22. In preparing the policies, the commission shall seek input from the governing boards, the state institutions of higher education, and the student representative to the advisory committee created pursuant to section 23-1-103 and representatives of the student governments at the state institutions of higher education.

The commission may waive the requirements of the policies adopted pursuant to this subsection (1).

On or before January 15, 2018, and on or before January 15 each year thereafter, the department shall report to the joint budget committee and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, concerning the governing boards' fee policies, the collection and use of student fees, and tuition rates.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the report required pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1417, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 815, § 1, effective May 18.